tests/data/space-eof-incond.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="somepardef">
      <e>       <p><l>foo</l><r>bar</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <section id="final" type="inconditional">
    <e>       <i>.<b/>y</i>   <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <i>.xx</i>   <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <i>.</i>        <p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  </section>

</dictionary>
